Tennessee, session 114, HB2352.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-1-153, is amended by deleting
subsection (b) and substituting:
(b)
(1) Notwithstanding subsection (a) and subject to subdivision (b)(2),
petitions and orders of the court in a delinquency or unruly proceeding under this
part are open to inspection, subject to the confidentiality requirements of §§ 10-7-
504 and 37-1-154, only by:
(A) A judge, magistrate, officer, or professional staff of a court
with juvenile jurisdiction in this state when acting in the course of official
duties;
(B) A district attorney general or assistant district attorney general
when the inspection relates to the performance of official duties in a
matter involving a child; and
(C) A public defender or assistant public defender when the
inspection relates to the performance of official duties in a matter
involving a child.
(2) A person with access to a petition or order under subdivision (b)(1)
shall not disclose, release, or disseminate the information except as otherwise
permitted by this part or other applicable law.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect January 1, 2027, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2352
012158
- 1 -